District of Columbia statutes.
1-609.08

Statutory officeholders.

The following employees of the District shall be deemed to be in the Excepted Service. Their terms of office shall be at the pleasure of the appointing authority, or as provided by statute for a term of years, subject to removal for cause as may be provided in their appointing statute:

(1)

City Administrator;

(2)

Repealed;

(3)

The Director of Campaign Finance, District of Columbia Board of Elections and Ethics;

(4)

Repealed;

(5)

Auditor of the District of Columbia;

(6)

The Chairman and members of the Public Service Commission;

(7)

The Chairman and members of the Board of Parole;

(8)

Executive Director of the Public Employee Relations Board;

(9)

Secretary to the Council;

(10)

Repealed;

(11)

Repealed;

(12)

Executive Director of the Office of Employee Appeals;

(13)

The Executive Director and Deputy Director of the District of Columbia Lottery and Charitable Games Control Board;

(14)

Budget Director to the Council;

(15)

The Chief Administrative Law Judge, the Administrative Law Judges, and the Executive Director of the Office of Administrative Hearings;

(16)

The Chief Tenant Advocate of the Office of the Tenant Advocate; and

(17)

The Real Property Tax Ombudsman of the Office of the Real Property Tax Ombudsman.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 908, 25 DCR 5740
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law 5-24, § 12(c), 30 DCR 3341
Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-205, § 2(c), 34 DCR 670
May 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-127, § 2(f), 37 DCR 2093
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124,§ 101(j), 45 DCR 2464
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-260, § 2(e), 46 DCR 1318
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 103(l), 47 DCR 520
Mar. 6, 2002, D.C. Law 14-76, § 23(a), 48 DCR 11442
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2069, 52 DCR 7503
Dec. 4, 2014, D.C. Law 20-141, § 201, 61 DCR 7763
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, §§ 7103(a), 7104, 61 DCR 9990

Cross References

Elections, disclosure of interests, see § 1-1106.02.
Lobbying, “official in the executive branch” defined, see § 1-1105.01.
Lottery and charitable games control board, Executive Director and Deputy Director, see § 3-1303.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-609.01, § 1-609.02, § 1-609.03, § 1-1161.01, § 2-1831.04, § 2-1831.08, § 2-1831.12, § 3-1303, and § 42-3531.06.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-610.8.
1973 Ed., § 1-339.8.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-91 repealed pars. (4) and (10), which read:
“(4) People’s Counsel of the District of Columbia;”
“(10) General Counsel to the Council;”; and in par. (13), added “and”.
D.C. Law 14-76 added par. (15).
D.C. Law 16-33, in subsec. (a), substituted a semicolon for “; and” at the end of the paragraph; in subsec. (b), substituted “; and” for period at the end of the paragraph; and added subsec. (c).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-141, repealed before its effective date, would have added (18) and made related changes.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 repealed D.C. Law 20-141; and added (17) and made related changes.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(e) of the Legal Service Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-620, January 22, 1999, 46 DCR 1343).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Legal Services Clarification and Technical Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-203, December 8, 1999, 46 DCR 10456).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Legal Services Clarification and Technical Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-293, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2063).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2069 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7113(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7103(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7103(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 20-141 became effective on Dec. 4, 2014, but was repealed prior to its effective date by emergency D.C. Act 20-377, § 7114, eff. July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, by emergency D.C. Act 20-449, § 7104, eff. October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, by emergency D.C. Act 20-566, § 7104, eff. January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, and by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7104, 61 DCR 9990.